Washington statutes.
RCW 4.76.010

New trial defined.

A new trial is a reexamination of an issue in the same court after a trial and decision by a jury, court or referees.

[Code 1881 s 275; 1877 p 56 s 279; 1869 p 67 s 277; 1854 p 170 s 215; RRS s 398.]